Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1339
Cooperative farm land company; investment in purchase-money mortgages by insurance companies, authorized.

Obligations of a cooperative farm land company secured by a first mortgage on agricultural lands purchased by a cooperative farm land company shall be a lawful investment for funds of any insurance company which has conveyed real estate to the company to the full extent of the purchase price.

Laws 1941, c. 38, § 7, p. 155;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 24-2107;

R.S.1943, § 21-1339;

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 55.